Utah statutes.
75-3-708.   Duty of personal representative -- Possession of estate.
Except as otherwise provided by a decedent's will, every personal
representative has a right to, and shall take possession or control of, the
decedent's property, except that any real property or tangible personal
property may be left with or surrendered to the person presumptively entitled
thereto unless or until, in the judgment of the personal representative,
possession of the property by him will be necessary for purposes of
administration. The request by a personal representative for delivery of any
property possessed by an heir or devisee is conclusive evidence, in any action
against the heir or devisee for possession thereof, that the possession of the
property by the personal representative is necessary for purposes of
administration. The personal representative shall pay taxes on, and take all
steps reasonably necessary for the management, protection, and preservation
of, the estate in his possession. He may maintain an action to recover
possession of property or to determine the title thereto.
